Washington statutes.
RCW 36.18.070

Single mileage chargeable when.

When any sheriff, constable or coroner serves more than one process in the same cause or on the same person not requiring more than one journey from his or her office, he or she shall receive mileage only for the most distant service.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4017; 1963 c 4 s 36.18.070. Prior: Code 1881 s 2094; 1869 p 373 s 16; RRS s 501.]